Nebraska, session 109, LB376.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 28-3,107, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-3,107 (1) Any physician who performs or induces or attempts to perform
or induce an abortion shall report to the Department of Health and Human
Services, on a schedule and in accordance with forms and rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the department:
(a) If a determination of probable postfertilization age was made, the
probable postfertilization age determined and the method and basis of the
determination;
(b) If a determination of probable postfertilization age was not made, the
basis of the determination that a medical emergency existed;
(c) If the probable postfertilization age was determined to be consistent
with the postfertilization age limits provided in section 71-6915 twenty or
more weeks, the basis of the determination that the pregnant woman had a
condition which so complicated her medical condition as to necessitate the
abortion of her pregnancy to avert her death or to avert serious risk of
substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function, or
the basis of the determination that it was necessary to preserve the life of an
unborn child; and
(d) The method used for the abortion and, in the case of an abortion
performed when the probable postfertilization age was determined to be
consistent with the postfertilization age limits provided in section 71-6915
twenty or more weeks, whether the method of abortion used was one that, in
reasonable medical judgment, provided the best opportunity for the unborn child
to survive or, if such a method was not used, the basis of the determination
that termination of the pregnancy in that manner would pose a greater risk
either of the death of the pregnant woman or of the substantial and
irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function of the woman than
would other available methods.
(2) By June 30 of each year, the department shall issue a public report
providing statistics for the previous calendar year compiled from all of the
reports covering that year submitted in accordance with this section for each
of the items listed in subsection (1) of this section. Each such report shall
also provide the statistics for all previous calendar years during which this
-1-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
section was in effect, adjusted to reflect any additional information from late
or corrected reports. The department shall take care to ensure that none of the
information included in the public reports could reasonably lead to the
identification of any pregnant woman upon whom an abortion was performed.
(3) Any physician who fails to submit a report by the end of thirty days
following the due date shall be subject to a late fee of five hundred dollars
for each additional thirty-day period or portion of a thirty-day period the
report is overdue. Any physician required to report in accordance with the
Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act who has not submitted a report, or has
submitted only an incomplete report, more than one year following the due date,
may, in an action brought in the manner in which actions are brought to enforce
the Uniform Credentialing Act pursuant to section 38-1,139, be directed by a
court of competent jurisdiction to submit a complete report within a time
period stated by court order or be subject to civil contempt. Failure by any
physician to conform to any requirement of this section, other than late filing
of a report, constitutes unprofessional conduct pursuant to section 38-2021.
Failure by any physician to submit a complete report in accordance with a court
order constitutes unprofessional conduct pursuant to section 38-2021.
Intentional or reckless falsification of any report required under this section
is a Class V misdemeanor.
(4) Within ninety days after October 15, 2010, the department shall adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations to assist in compliance with this section.
Sec. 2. Section 38-1130, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
38-1130 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a licensed
dental hygienist shall perform the dental hygiene functions listed in section
38-1131 only when authorized to do so by a licensed dentist who shall be
responsible for the total oral health care of the patient.
(2) The department may authorize a licensed dental hygienist to perform
the following functions in the conduct of public health-related services in a
public health setting or in a health care or related facility: Preliminary
charting and screening examinations; oral health education, including workshops
and inservice training sessions on dental health; and all of the duties that a
dental assistant who is not licensed is authorized to perform.
(3)(a) Except for periodontal scaling, root planing, and the
administration of local anesthesia and nitrous oxide, the department may
authorize a licensed dental hygienist to perform all of the authorized
functions within the scope of practice of a licensed dental hygienist in the
conduct of public health-related services in a public health setting or in a
health care or related facility. In addition, the department may authorize a
licensed dental hygienist to perform the following functions in such a setting
or facility or for such a patient:
(i) Upon completion of education and testing approved by the board,
writing prescriptions for mouth rinses and fluoride products that help decrease
risk for tooth decay; and
(ii) Upon completion of education and testing approved by the board, minor
denture adjustments.
(b) Authorization shall be granted by the department under this subsection
upon (i) filing an application with the department and (ii) providing evidence
of current licensure and professional liability insurance coverage.
Authorization may be limited by the department as necessary to protect the
public health and safety upon good cause shown and may be renewed in connection
with renewal of the licensed dental hygienist's license.
(c) A licensed dental hygienist performing dental hygiene functions as
authorized under this subsection shall (i) report authorized functions
performed by him or her to the department on a form developed and provided by
the department and (ii) advise the patient or recipient of services or his or
her authorized representative that such services are preventive in nature and
do not constitute a comprehensive dental diagnosis and care.
(4) The department shall compile the data from the reports provided under
subdivision (3)(c)(i) of this section and provide an annual report to the Board
of Dentistry and the State Board of Health. The department shall annually
evaluate the delivery of dental hygiene services in the state and, on or before
September 15 of each year beginning in 2021, provide a report electronically to
the Clerk of the Legislature regarding such evaluation. The Health and Human
Services Committee of the Legislature shall hold a hearing at least once every
three years to assess the reports submitted pursuant to this subsection.
(4) (5) For purposes of this section:
(a) Health care or related facility means a hospital, a nursing facility,
an assisted-living facility, a correctional facility, a tribal clinic, or a
school-based preventive health program; and
(b) Public health setting means a federal, state, or local public health
department or clinic, community health center, rural health clinic, or other
similar program or agency that serves primarily public health care program
recipients.
Sec. 3. Section 38-1208.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
38-1208.01 Paramedic practice of emergency medical care means care
provided in accordance with the knowledge and skill acquired through successful
completion of an approved program for a paramedic. Such care includes, but is
not limited to, (1) all of the acts that an advanced emergency medical
technician is authorized to technician-intermediate can perform, and (2)
visualized intubation, (3) surgical cricothyrotomy, and (4) until December 31,
-2-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
2025, all of the acts that an emergency medical technician-intermediate is
authorized to perform.
Sec. 4. Section 38-1216, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
38-1216 In addition to any other responsibilities prescribed by the
Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, the board shall:
(1) Promote the dissemination of public information and education programs
to inform the public about emergency medical service and other medical
information, including appropriate methods of medical self-help, first aid, and
the availability of emergency medical services training programs in the state;
(2) Provide for the collection of information for evaluation of the
availability and quality of emergency medical care, evaluate the availability
and quality of emergency medical care, and serve as a focal point for
discussion of the provision of emergency medical care;
(3) Establish model procedures for patient management in medical
emergencies that do not limit the authority of law enforcement and fire
protection personnel to manage the scene during a medical emergency; and
(4) Not less than once each five years, undertake a review and evaluation
of the act and its implementation together with a review of the emergency
medical care needs of the residents of the State of Nebraska and submit
electronically a report to the Legislature with any recommendations which it
may have; and
(4) (5) Identify communication needs of emergency medical services and
make recommendations for development of a communications plan for a
communications network for emergency care providers and emergency medical
services.
Sec. 5. Section 43-512.11, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-512.11 The Department of Health and Human Services shall submit
electronically an annual report, not later than December February 1 of each
year, to the Legislature regarding the effectiveness of programs established
pursuant to subdivision (5)(a) of section 43-512. The report shall include, but
not be limited to:
(1) The number of program participants;
(2) The number of program participants who become employed, whether such
employment is full time or part time or subsidized or unsubsidized, and whether
the employment was retained for at least thirty days;
(3) Supportive services provided to participants in the program;
(4) Grant reductions realized; and
(5) A cost and benefit statement for the program.
Sec. 6. Section 43-3301, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-3301 Sections 43-3301 to 43-3325 43-3326 shall be known and may be
cited as the License Suspension Act.
Sec. 7. Section 43-3342.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-3342.04 (1) The Title IV-D Division shall establish a Customer Service
Unit. In hiring the initial staff for the unit, a hiring preference shall be
given to employees of the clerks of the district court. The duties of the
Customer Service Unit include, but are not limited to:
(a) Providing account information as well as addressing inquiries made by
customers of the State Disbursement Unit; and
(b) Administering two statewide toll-free telephone systems, one for use
by employers and one for use by all other customers, to provide responses to
inquiries regarding income withholding, the collection and disbursement of
support order payments made to the State Disbursement Unit, and other child
support enforcement issues, including establishing a call center with
sufficient telephone lines, a voice response unit, and adequate personnel
available during normal business hours to ensure that responses to inquiries
are made by the division's personnel or the division's designee.
(2) The physical location of the Customer Service Unit shall be in
Nebraska and shall result in the hiring of a number of new employees or
contractor's staff equal to at least one-fourth of one percent of the labor
force in the county or counties in which the Customer Service Unit is located.
Customer service staff responsible for providing account information related to
the State Disbursement Unit may be located at the same location as the State
Disbursement Unit.
(3) The department shall issue a report to the Governor and to the
Legislature on or before January 31 of each year which discloses information
relating to the operation of the State Disbursement Unit for the preceding
calendar year including, but not limited to:
(a) The number of transactions processed by the State Disbursement Unit;
(b) The dollar amount collected by the State Disbursement Unit;
(c) The dollar amount disbursed by the State Disbursement Unit;
(d) The percentage of identifiable collections disbursed within two
business days;
(e) The percentage of identifiable collections that are matched to the
correct case;
(f) The number and dollar amount of insufficient funds checks received by
the State Disbursement Unit;
(g) The number and dollar amount of insufficient funds checks received by
the State Disbursement Unit for which restitution is subsequently made to the
State Disbursement Unit;
-3-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
(h) The number of incoming telephone calls processed through the Customer
Service Unit;
(i) The average length of incoming calls from employers;
(j) The average length of incoming calls from all other customers;
(k) The percentage of incoming calls resulting in abandonment by the
customer;
(l) The percentage of incoming calls resulting in a customer receiving a
busy signal;
(m) The average holding time for all incoming calls; and
(n) The percentage of calls handled by employees of the Customer Service
Unit that are resolved within twenty-four hours.
(4) The report issued to the Legislature pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section shall be issued electronically.
Sec. 8. Section 43-4706, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4706 (1) The department shall ensure that each foster family home and
child-care institution has policies consistent with this section and that such
foster family home and child-care institution promote and protect the ability
of children to participate in age or developmentally appropriate
extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities.
(2) A caregiver shall use a reasonable and prudent parent standard in
determining whether to give permission for a child to participate in
extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities. The caregiver
shall take reasonable steps to determine the appropriateness of the activity in
consideration of the child’s age, maturity, and developmental level.
(3) The department shall require, as a condition of each contract entered
into by a child-care institution to provide foster care, the presence onsite of
at least one official who, with respect to any child placed at the child-care
institution, is designated to be the caregiver who is (a) authorized to apply
the reasonable and prudent parent standard to decisions involving the
participation of the child in age or developmentally appropriate activities,
(b) provided with training in how to use and apply the reasonable and prudent
parent standard in the same manner as foster parents are provided training in
section 43-4707, and (c) required to consult whenever possible with the child
and staff members identified by the child in applying the reasonable and
prudent parent standard.
(4) The department shall also require, as a condition of each contract
entered into by a child-care institution to provide foster care, that all
children placed at the child-care institution be notified verbally and in
writing, in an age or developmentally appropriate manner, of the process for
making a request to participate in age or developmentally appropriate
activities and that a written notice of this process be posted in an
accessible, public place in the child-care institution.
(5)(a) The department shall also require, as a condition of each contract
entered into by a child-care institution to provide foster care, a written
normalcy plan describing how the child-care institution will ensure that all
children have access to age or developmentally appropriate activities to be
filed with the department and a normalcy report regarding the implementation of
the normalcy plan to be filed with the department annually by July 15 June 30.
Such plans and reports shall not be required to be provided by child-care
institutions physically located outside the State of Nebraska or psychiatric
residential treatment facilities.
(b) The normalcy plan shall specifically address:
(i) Efforts to address barriers to normalcy that are inherent in a child-
care institution setting;
(ii) Normalcy efforts for all children placed at the child-care
institution, including, but not limited to, relationships with family, age or
developmentally appropriate access to technology and technological skills,
education and school stability, access to health care and information, and
access to a sustainable and durable routine;
(iii) Procedures for developing goals and action steps in the child-care
institution’s case plan and case planning process related to participation in
age or developmentally appropriate activities for each child placed at the
child-care institution;
(iv) Policies on staffing, supervision, permission, and consent to age or
developmentally appropriate activities consistent with the reasonable and
prudent parent standard;
(v) A list of activities that the child-care institution provides onsite
and a list of activities in the community regarding which the child-care
institution will make children aware, promote, and support access;
(vi) Identified accommodations and support services so that children with
disabilities and special needs can participate in age or developmentally
appropriate activities to the same extent as their peers;
(vii) The individualized needs of all children involved in the system;
(viii) Efforts to reduce disproportionate impact of the system and
services on families and children of color and other populations; and
(ix) Efforts to develop a youth board to assist in implementing the
reasonable and prudent parent standard in the child-care institution and
promoting and supporting normalcy.
(c) The normalcy report shall specifically address:
(i) Compliance with each of the plan requirements set forth in
subdivisions (b)(i) through (ix) of this subsection; and
(ii) Compliance with subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
-4-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
(6) The department shall make normalcy plans and reports received from
contracting child-care institutions pursuant to subsection (5) of this section
and plans and reports from all youth rehabilitation and treatment centers
pursuant to subsection (7) of this section available annually upon request to
the Nebraska Strengthening Families Act Committee, the Nebraska Children's
Commission, probation, the Governor, and electronically to the Health and Human
Services Committee of the Legislature, by September 30 1 of each year.
(7) All youth rehabilitation and treatment centers shall meet the
requirements of subsection (5) of this section.
Sec. 9. Section 68-130, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
68-130 (1) Until June 30, 2028, counties Counties shall maintain, at no
additional cost to the Department of Health and Human Services, office and
service facilities used for the administration of the public assistance
programs as such facilities existed on April 1, 1983.
(2) The county board of any county may request in writing that the
department review office and service facilities provided by the county for the
department to determine if the department is able to reduce or eliminate office
and service facilities within the county. The department shall respond in
writing to such request within thirty days after receiving the request. The
final decision with respect to maintaining, reducing, or eliminating office and
service facilities in such county shall be made by the department, and the
county may reduce or eliminate office and service facilities if authorized by
such final decision.
Sec. 10. Section 68-158, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
68-158 The Department of Health and Human Services shall establish a
program to provide amino acid-based elemental formulas for the diagnosis and
treatment of Immunoglobulin E and non-Immunoglobulin E mediated allergies to
multiple food proteins, food-protein-induced enterocolitis syndrome,
eosinophilic disorders, and impaired absorption of nutrients caused by
disorders affecting the absorptive surface, functional length, and motility of
the gastrointestinal tract, when the ordering physician has issued a written
order stating that the amino acid-based elemental formula is medically
necessary for the treatment of a disease or disorder. Up to fifty percent of
the actual out-of-pocket cost, not to exceed twelve thousand dollars, for amino
acid-based elemental formulas shall be available to an individual without fees
each twelve-month period. The department shall distribute funds on a first-
come, first-served basis. Nothing in this section is deemed to be an
entitlement. The maximum total General Fund expenditures per year for amino
acid-based elemental formulas shall not exceed two hundred fifty thousand
dollars each fiscal year in FY2014-15 and FY2015-16. The Department of Health
and Human Services shall provide an electronic report on the program to the
Legislature annually on or before December 15 of each year.
Sec. 11. Section 68-909, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
68-909 (1) All contracts, agreements, rules, and regulations relating to
the medical assistance program as entered into or adopted and promulgated by
the department prior to July 1, 2006, and all provisions of the medicaid state
plan and waivers adopted by the department prior to July 1, 2006, shall remain
in effect until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law.
(2) Prior to the adoption and promulgation of proposed rules and
regulations under section 68-912 or relating to the implementation of medicaid
state plan amendments or waivers, the department shall provide a report to the
Governor and the Legislature no later than December 1 before the next regular
session of the Legislature summarizing the purpose and content of such proposed
rules and regulations and the projected impact of such proposed rules and
regulations on recipients of medical assistance and medical assistance
expenditures. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. Any changes in medicaid copayments in fiscal year 2011-12 are
exempt from the reporting requirement of this subsection and the requirements
of section 68-912.
(2) (3) The department shall monitor the implementation of rules and
regulations, medicaid state plan amendments, and waivers adopted under the
Medical Assistance Act and the effect of such rules and regulations,
amendments, or waivers on eligible recipients of medical assistance and medical
assistance expenditures.
Sec. 12. Section 68-912, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
68-912 (1) The department may establish (a) premiums, copayments, and
deductibles for goods and services provided under the medical assistance
program, (b) limits on the amount, duration, and scope of goods and services
that recipients may receive under the medical assistance program subject to
subsection (5) of this section, and (c) requirements for recipients of medical
assistance as a necessary condition for the continued receipt of such
assistance, including, but not limited to, active participation in care
coordination and appropriate disease management programs and activities.
(2) In establishing and limiting coverage for services under the medical
assistance program, the department shall consider (a) the effect of such
coverage and limitations on recipients of medical assistance and medical
assistance expenditures, (b) the public policy in section 68-905, (c) the
experience and outcomes of other states, (d) the nature and scope of benchmark
or benchmark-equivalent health insurance coverage as recognized under federal
-5-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
law, and (e) other relevant factors as determined by the department.
(3) Coverage for mandatory and optional services and limitations on
covered services as established by the department prior to July 1, 2006, shall
remain in effect until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to
law. Any proposed reduction or expansion of services or limitation of covered
services by the department under this section shall be subject to the reporting
and review requirements of section 68-909.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, proposed rules and
regulations under this section relating to the establishment of premiums,
copayments, or deductibles for eligible recipients or limits on the amount,
duration, or scope of covered services for eligible recipients shall not become
effective until the conclusion of the earliest regular session of the
Legislature in which there has been a reasonable opportunity for legislative
consideration of such rules and regulations. This subsection does not apply to
rules and regulations that are (a) required by federal or state law, (b)
related to a waiver in which recipient participation is voluntary, or (c)
proposed due to a loss of federal matching funds relating to a particular
covered service or eligibility category. Legislative consideration includes,
but is not limited to, the introduction of a legislative bill, a legislative
resolution, or an amendment to pending legislation relating to such rules and
regulations.
(5) Any limitation on the amount, duration, or scope of goods and services
that recipients may receive under the medical assistance program shall give
full and deliberate consideration to the role of home health services from
private duty nurses in meeting the needs of a disabled family member or
disabled person.
Sec. 13. Section 68-974, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
68-974 (1) One or more program integrity contractors may be used to
promote the integrity of the medical assistance program, to assist with
investigations and audits, or to investigate the occurrence of fraud, waste, or
abuse. The contract or contracts may include services for (a) cost-avoidance
through identification of third-party liability, (b) cost recovery of third-
party liability through postpayment reimbursement, (c) casualty recovery of
payments by identifying and recovering costs for claims that were the result of
an accident or neglect and payable by a casualty insurer, and (d) reviews of
claims submitted by providers of services or other individuals furnishing items
and services for which payment has been made to determine whether providers
have been underpaid or overpaid, and to take actions to recover any
overpayments identified or make payment for any underpayment identified.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all program integrity
contractors when conducting a program integrity audit, investigation, or review
shall:
(a) Review claims within four years from the date of the payment;
(b) Send a determination letter concluding an audit within one hundred
eighty days after receipt of all requested material from a provider;
(c) In any records request to a provider, furnish information sufficient
for the provider to identify the patient, procedure, or location;
(d) Develop and implement with the department a procedure in which an
improper payment identified by an audit may be resubmitted as a claims
adjustment, including (i) the resubmission of claims denied as a result of an
interpretation of scope of services not previously held by the department, (ii)
the resubmission of documentation when the document provided is incomplete,
illegible, or unclear, and (iii) the resubmission of documentation when
clerical errors resulted in a denial of claims for services actually provided.
If a service was provided and sufficiently documented but denied because it was
determined by the department or the contractor that a different service should
have been provided, the department or the contractor shall disallow the
difference between the payment for the service that was provided and the
payment for the service that should have been provided;
(e) Utilize a licensed health care professional from the specialty area of
practice being audited to establish relevant audit methodology consistent with
(i) state-issued medicaid provider handbooks and (ii) established clinical
practice guidelines and acceptable standards of care established by
professional or specialty organizations responsible for setting such standards
of care;
(f) Provide a written notification and explanation of an adverse
determination that includes the reason for the adverse determination, the
medical criteria on which the adverse determination was based, an explanation
of the provider's appeal rights, and, if applicable, the appropriate procedure
to submit a claims adjustment in accordance with subdivision (2)(d) of this
section; and
(g) Schedule any onsite audits with advance notice of not less than ten
business days and make a good faith effort to establish a mutually agreed-upon
time and date for the onsite audit.
(3) A program integrity contractor retained by the department or the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services shall work with the
department at the start of a recovery audit to review this section and section
68-973 and any other relevant state policies, procedures, regulations, and
guidelines regarding program integrity audits. The program integrity contractor
shall comply with this section regarding audit procedures. A copy of the
statutes, policies, and procedures shall be specifically maintained in the
audit records to support the audit findings.
-6-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
(4) The department shall exclude from the scope of review of recovery
audit contractors any claim processed or paid through a capitated medicaid
managed care program. The department shall exclude from the scope of review of
program integrity contractors any claims that are currently being audited or
that have been audited by a program integrity contractor, by the department, or
by another entity. Claims processed or paid through a capitated medicaid
managed care program shall be coordinated between the department, the
contractor, and the managed care organization. All such audits shall be
coordinated as to scope, method, and timing. The contractor and the department
shall avoid duplication or simultaneous audits. No payment shall be recovered
in a medical necessity review in which the provider has obtained prior
authorization for the service and the service was performed as authorized.
(5) Extrapolated overpayments are not allowed under the Medical Assistance
Act without evidence of a sustained pattern of error, an excessively high error
rate, or the agreement of the provider.
(6) The department may contract with one or more persons to support a
health insurance premium assistance payment program.
(7) The department may enter into any other contracts deemed to increase
the efforts to promote the integrity of the medical assistance program.
(8) Contracts entered into under the authority of this section may be on a
contingent fee basis. Contracts entered into on a contingent fee basis shall
provide that contingent fee payments are based upon amounts recovered, not
amounts identified. Whether the contract is a contingent fee contract or
otherwise, the contractor shall not recover overpayments by the department
until all appeals have been completed unless there is a credible allegation of
fraudulent activity by the provider, the contractor has referred the claims to
the department for investigation, and an investigation has commenced. In that
event, the contractor may recover overpayment prior to the conclusion of the
appeals process. In any contract between the department and a program integrity
contractor, the payment or fee provided for identification of overpayments
shall be the same provided for identification of underpayments. Contracts shall
be in compliance with federal law and regulations when pertinent, including a
limit on contingent fees of no more than twelve and one-half percent of amounts
recovered, and initial contracts shall be entered into as soon as practicable
under such federal law and regulations.
(9) All amounts recovered and savings generated as a result of this
section shall be returned to the medical assistance program.
(10) Records requests made by a program integrity contractor in any one-
hundred-eighty-day period shall be limited to not more than two hundred records
for the specific service being reviewed. The contractor shall allow a provider
no less than forty-five days to respond to and comply with a records request.
If the contractor can demonstrate a significant provider error rate relative to
an audit of records, the contractor may make a request to the department to
initiate an additional records request regarding the subject under review for
the purpose of further review and validation. The contractor shall not make the
request until the time period for the appeals process has expired.
(11) On an annual basis, the department shall require the recovery audit
contractor to compile and publish on the department's Internet website metrics
related to the performance of each recovery audit contractor. Such metrics
shall include: (a) The number and type of issues reviewed; (b) the number of
medical records requested; (c) the number of overpayments and the aggregate
dollar amounts associated with the overpayments identified by the contractor;
(d) the number of underpayments and the aggregate dollar amounts associated
with the identified underpayments; (e) the duration of audits from initiation
to time of completion; (f) the number of adverse determinations and the
overturn rating of those determinations in the appeal process; (g) the number
of appeals filed by providers and the disposition status of such appeals; (h)
the contractor's compensation structure and dollar amount of compensation; and
(i) a copy of the department's contract with the recovery audit contractor.
(12) The program integrity contractor, in conjunction with the department,
shall perform educational and training programs for providers that encompass a
summary of audit results, a description of common issues, problems, and
mistakes identified through audits and reviews, and opportunities for
improvement.
(13) Providers shall be allowed to submit records requested as a result of
an audit in electronic format, including compact disc, digital versatile disc,
or other electronic format deemed appropriate by the department or via
facsimile transmission, at the request of the provider.
(14)(a) A provider shall have the right to appeal a determination made by
the program integrity contractor.
(b) The contractor shall establish an informal consultation process to be
utilized prior to the issuance of a final determination. Within thirty days
after receipt of notification of a preliminary finding from the contractor, the
provider may request an informal consultation with the contractor to discuss
and attempt to resolve the findings or portion of such findings in the
preliminary findings letter. The request shall be made to the contractor. The
consultation shall occur within thirty days after the provider's request for
informal consultation, unless otherwise agreed to by both parties.
(c) Within thirty days after notification of an adverse determination, a
provider may request an administrative appeal of the adverse determination as
set forth in the Administrative Procedure Act.
(15) The department shall by December 1 of each year report to the
Legislature the status of the contracts, including the parties, the programs
-7-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
and issues addressed, the estimated cost recovery, and the savings accrued as a
result of the contracts. Such report shall be filed electronically.
(15) (16) For purposes of this section:
(a) Adverse determination means any decision rendered by a program
integrity contractor or recovery audit contractor that results in a payment to
a provider for a claim for service being reduced or rescinded;
(b) Extrapolated overpayment means an overpayment amount obtained by
calculating claims denials and reductions from a medical records review based
on a statistical sampling of a claims universe;
(c) Person means bodies politic and corporate, societies, communities, the
public generally, individuals, partnerships, limited liability companies,
joint-stock companies, and associations;
(d) Program integrity audit means an audit conducted by the federal
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the department, or the federal
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services with the coordination and
cooperation of the department;
(e) Program integrity contractor means private entities with which the
department or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services contracts
to carry out integrity responsibilities under the medical assistance program,
including, but not limited to, recovery audits, integrity audits, and unified
program integrity audits, in order to identify underpayments and overpayments
and recoup overpayments; and
(f) Recovery audit contractor means private entities with which the
department contracts to audit claims for medical assistance, identify
underpayments and overpayments, and recoup overpayments.
Sec. 14. Section 68-995, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
68-995 All contracts and agreements relating to the medical assistance
program governing at-risk managed care service delivery for health services
entered into by the department and existing on or after August 11, 2020, shall:
(1) Provide a definition and cap on administrative spending such that (a)
administrative expenditures do not include profit greater than the contracted
amount, (b) any administrative spending is necessary to improve the health
status of the population to be served, and (c) administrative expenditures do
not include contractor incentives. Administrative spending shall not under any
circumstances exceed twelve percent . Such spending shall be tracked by the
contractor and reported quarterly to the department and electronically to the
Clerk of the Legislature;
(2) Provide a definition of annual contractor profits and losses and
restrict such profits and losses under the contract so that profit shall not
exceed a percentage specified by the department but not more than three percent
per year as a percentage of the aggregate of all income and revenue earned by
the contractor and related parties, including parent and subsidiary companies
and risk-bearing partners, under the contract;
(3) Provide for return of (a) any remittance if the contractor does not
meet the minimum medical loss ratio, (b) any unearned incentive funds, and (c)
any other funds in excess of the contractor limitations identified in state or
federal statute or contract to the State Treasurer for credit to the Medicaid
Managed Care Excess Profit Fund;
(4) Provide for a minimum medical loss ratio of eighty-five percent of the
aggregate of all income and revenue earned by the contractor and related
parties under the contract;
(5) Provide that contractor incentives, in addition to potential profit,
be up to two percent of the aggregate of all income and revenue earned by the
contractor and related parties under the contract; and
(6) Be reviewed and awarded competitively and in full compliance with the
procurement requirements of the State of Nebraska.
Sec. 15. Section 68-9,109, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
68-9,109 The Department of Health and Human Services shall electronically
submit a report to the Legislature on or before December 15 of each year
beginning December 15, 2024, through December 15, 2029, on the Nebraska
Prenatal Plus Program which includes (1) the number of mothers served, (2) the
services offered, and (3) the birth outcomes for each mother served.
Sec. 16. Section 68-1530, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
68-1530 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall apply for a
three-year medicaid waiver under section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security
Act to administer a family support program which is a home and community-based
services program as provided in this section.
(2)(a) The Advisory Committee on Developmental Disabilities created in
section 83-1212.01 shall assist in the development and guide the implementation
of the family support program. The family support program shall be administered
by the Division of Developmental Disabilities of the Department of Health and
Human Services.
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that any funds distributed to
Nebraska pursuant to section 9817 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of
2021, Public Law 117-2, be used to eliminate unmet needs relating to home and
community-based services for persons with developmental disabilities as much as
is possible.
(c) If funds are distributed to Nebraska pursuant to section 9817 of the
federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, it is the intent of the Legislature
that such funds distributed to Nebraska should at least partially fund the
-8-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
family support program if doing so is in accordance with federal law, rules,
regulations, or guidance.
(3) The family support program shall:
(a) Offer an annual capped budget for long-term services and supports of
ten thousand dollars for each eligible applicant;
(b) Offer a pathway for medicaid eligibility for disabled children by
disregarding parental income and establishing eligibility based on a child's
income and assets;
(c) Allow a family to self-direct services, including contracting for
services and supports approved by the division; and
(d) Not exceed eight hundred fifty participants.
(4) The department, in consultation with the advisory committee, shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of the family
support program to be set at an intermediate care facility institutional level
of care to support children with intellectual and developmental disabilities
and their families. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be
limited to:
(a) Criteria for and types of long-term services and supports to be
provided by the family support program;
(b) The method, as provided in section 68-1532, for allocating resources
to family units participating in the family support program;
(c) Eligibility determination, including, but not limited to, a child's
maximum income and assets;
(d) The enrollment process;
(e) Limits on benefits; and
(f) Processes to establish quality assurance, including, but not limited
to, measures of family satisfaction.
(5) The division shall administer the family support program within the
limits of the appropriations by the Legislature for such program.
(6) Until December 31, 2027, the The division shall submit an annual
report electronically to the Legislature on the family support program. The
report shall include:
(a) The distribution of available funds, the total number of children and
families served, and the status of the waiting list for the comprehensive
waiver and other applicable waivers;
(b) A summary of any grievances filed by family units pertaining to the
family support program, including any appeals and a description of how such
grievances were resolved;
(c) The number and demographics of children with disabilities and their
families who applied under the family support program but who were not found
eligible and the reason such children and their families were not found
eligible;
(d) Quality assurance activities and the results of annual measures of
family satisfaction; and
(e) Recommendations to innovate the family support program, improve
current programming, and maximize limited funding, including, but not limited
to, the potential utilization of other medicaid pathways or medicaid waivers
that could help increase access to medicaid and long-term services and supports
for children with disabilities or special health care needs.
Sec. 17. Section 68-1735.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
68-1735.03 It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of
Health and Human Services carry out the requirements of sections 68-1735 and
68-1735.01 to 68-1735.02 within the limits of its annual appropriation.
Sec. 18. Section 68-1804, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
68-1804 (1) The ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection Fund is created. Any money
in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act. Interest and income earned by the fund shall be credited
to the fund.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2014, the department shall use the ICF/DD
Reimbursement Protection Fund, including the matching federal financial
participation under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, as amended, for
purposes of enhancing rates paid under the medical assistance program to
intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities and
for an annual contribution to community-based programs for persons with
developmental disabilities as specified in subsection (4) of this section,
exclusive of the reimbursement paid under the medical assistance program and
any other state appropriations to intermediate care facilities for persons with
developmental disabilities.
(3) For FY2011-12 through FY2013-14, proceeds from the tax imposed
pursuant to section 68-1803 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection Fund for allocation as follows:
(a) First, fifty-five thousand dollars for administration of the fund;
(b) Second, the amount needed to reimburse intermediate care facilities
for persons with developmental disabilities for the cost of the tax;
(c) Third, three hundred twelve thousand dollars for community-based
services for persons with developmental disabilities;
(d) Fourth, six hundred thousand dollars or such lesser amount as may be
available in the fund for non-state-operated intermediate care facilities for
persons with developmental disabilities, in addition to any continuation
appropriations percentage increase provided by the Legislature to
-9-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
nongovernmental intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental
disabilities under the medical assistance program, subject to approval by the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the department's annual
application amending the medicaid state plan reimbursement methodology for
intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities; and
(e) Fifth, the remainder of the proceeds to the General Fund.
(4) For FY2016-17 and each fiscal year thereafter, the ICF/DD
Reimbursement Protection Fund shall be used as follows:
(a) First, fifty-five thousand dollars to the department for
administration of the fund;
(b) Second, payment to the intermediate care facilities for persons with
developmental disabilities for the cost of the tax;
(c) Third, three hundred twelve thousand dollars, in addition to any
federal medicaid matching funds, for payment to providers of community-based
services for persons with developmental disabilities;
(d) Fourth, one million dollars to the General Fund; and
(e) Fifth, rebase rates under the medical assistance program in accordance
with the medicaid state plan as defined in section 68-907. In calculating
rates, the proceeds of the tax provided for in section 68-1803 and not utilized
under subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection shall be used to
enhance rates in non-state-operated intermediate care facilities for persons
with developmental disabilities by increasing the annual inflation factor to
the extent allowed to ensure federal financial participation for the
department's payments to intermediate care facilities for persons with
developmental disabilities.
(5) The Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Department of
Health and Human Services shall report electronically, no later than December 1
of each year, to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature and
the Revenue Committee of the Legislature the amounts collected from each payer
of the tax pursuant to section 68-1803 and the amount of each disbursement from
the ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection Fund.
Sec. 19. Section 69-2409.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
69-2409.01 (1) For purposes of sections 69-2401 to 69-2425, the Nebraska
State Patrol shall be furnished with only such information as may be necessary
for the sole purpose of determining whether an individual is disqualified from
purchasing or possessing a handgun pursuant to state law or is subject to the
disability provisions of 18 U.S.C. 922(d)(4) and (g)(4). Such information shall
be furnished by the Department of Health and Human Services. The clerks of the
various courts shall furnish to the Department of Health and Human Services and
Nebraska State Patrol, as soon as practicable but within thirty days after an
order of commitment or discharge is issued or after removal of firearm-related
disabilities pursuant to section 71-963, all information necessary to set up
and maintain the database required by this section. This information shall
include (a) information regarding those persons who are currently receiving
mental health treatment pursuant to a commitment order of a mental health board
or who have been discharged, (b) information regarding those persons who have
been committed to treatment pursuant to section 29-3702, and (c) information
regarding those persons who have had firearm-related disabilities removed
pursuant to section 71-963. The mental health board shall notify the Department
of Health and Human Services and the Nebraska State Patrol when such
disabilities have been removed. The Department of Health and Human Services
shall also maintain in the database a listing of persons committed to treatment
pursuant to section 29-3702. To ensure the accuracy of the database, any
information maintained or disclosed under this subsection shall be updated,
corrected, modified, or removed, as appropriate, and as soon as practicable,
from any database that the state or federal government maintains and makes
available to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System. The
procedures for furnishing the information shall guarantee that no information
is released beyond what is necessary for purposes of this section.
(2) In order to comply with sections 69-2401 and 69-2403 to 69-2408 and
this section, the Nebraska State Patrol shall provide to the chief of police or
sheriff of an applicant's place of residence or a licensee in the process of a
criminal history record check pursuant to section 69-2411 only the information
regarding whether or not the applicant is disqualified from purchasing or
possessing a handgun.
(3) Any person, agency, or mental health board participating in good faith
in the reporting or disclosure of records and communications under this section
is immune from any liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result
by reason of the action.
(4) Any person who intentionally causes the Nebraska State Patrol to
request information pursuant to this section without reasonable belief that the
named individual has submitted a written application under section 69-2404 or
has completed a consent form under section 69-2410 shall be guilty of a Class
II misdemeanor in addition to other civil or criminal liability under state or
federal law.
(5) The Nebraska State Patrol and the Department of Health and Human
Services shall report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature on a
biannual basis the following information about the database: (a) The number of
total records of persons unable to purchase or possess firearms because of
disqualification or disability shared with the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System; (b) the number of shared records by category of such
persons; (c) the change in number of total shared records and change in number
-10-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
of records by category from the previous six months; (d) the number of records
existing but not able to be shared with the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System because the record was incomplete and unable to be
accepted by the National Instant Criminal Background Check System; and (e) the
number of hours or days, if any, during which the database was unable to share
records with the National Instant Criminal Background Check System and the
reason for such inability. The report shall also be published on the websites
of the Nebraska State Patrol and the Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 20. Section 71-509, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-509 (1) If a health care facility or alternate facility determines that
a patient treated or transported by an emergency services provider has been
diagnosed or detected with an infectious airborne disease, the health care
facility or alternate facility shall notify the department as soon as practical
but not later than forty-eight hours after the determination has been made. The
department shall investigate all notifications from health care facilities and
alternate facilities and notify as soon as practical the physician medical
director of each emergency medical service with an affected emergency medical
care provider employed by or associated with the service, the fire chief of
each fire department with an affected firefighter employed by or associated
with the department, the head of each law enforcement agency with an affected
peace officer employed by or associated with the agency, the funeral director
of each funeral establishment with an affected individual employed by or
associated with the funeral establishment, and any emergency services provider
known to the department with a significant exposure who is not employed by or
associated with an emergency medical service, a fire department, a law
enforcement agency, or a funeral establishment. Notification of affected
individuals shall be made as soon as practical.
(2) Whenever an emergency services provider believes he or she has had a
significant exposure while acting as an emergency services provider, he or she
may complete a significant exposure report form. A copy of the completed form
shall be given by the emergency services provider to the health care facility
or alternate facility, to the emergency services provider's supervisor, and to
the designated physician.
(3) Upon receipt of the significant exposure form, if a patient has been
diagnosed during the normal course of treatment as having an infectious disease
or condition or information is received from which it may be concluded that a
patient has an infectious disease or condition, the health care facility or
alternate facility receiving the form shall notify the designated physician
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. If the patient has not been
diagnosed as having an infectious disease or condition and upon the request of
the designated physician, the health care facility or alternate facility shall
request the patient's attending physician or other responsible person to order
the necessary diagnostic testing of the patient to determine the presence of an
infectious disease or condition. Upon such request, the patient's attending
physician or other responsible person shall order the necessary diagnostic
testing subject to section 71-510. Each health care facility shall develop a
policy or protocol to administer such testing and assure confidentiality of
such testing.
(4) Results of tests conducted under this section and section 71-510 shall
be reported by the health care facility or alternate facility that conducted
the test to the designated physician and to the patient's attending physician,
if any.
(5) Notification of the patient's diagnosis of infectious disease or
condition, including the results of any tests, shall be made orally to the
designated physician within forty-eight hours of confirmed diagnosis. A written
report shall be forwarded to the designated physician within seventy-two hours
of confirmed diagnosis.
(6) Upon receipt of notification under subsection (5) of this section, the
designated physician shall notify the emergency services provider of the
exposure to infectious disease or condition and the results of any tests
conducted under this section and section 71-510.
(7) The notification to the emergency services provider shall include the
name of the infectious disease or condition diagnosed but shall not contain the
patient's name or any other identifying information. Any person receiving such
notification shall treat the information received as confidential and shall not
disclose the information except as provided in sections 71-507 to 71-513.
(8) The provider agency shall be responsible for the costs of diagnostic
testing required under this section and section 71-510, except that if a person
renders emergency care gratuitously as described in section 25-21,186, such
person shall be responsible for the costs.
(9) The patient's attending physician shall inform the patient of test
results for all tests conducted under this section and section 71-510 such
sections.
Sec. 21. Section 71-604.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-604.02 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Biological mother means a person who is related to a child as the
source of the egg that resulted in the conception of the child; and
(b) Birth mother means the person who gave birth to the child.
(2) During the period immediately before or after the in-hospital birth of
a child whose biological mother is not the same as the birth mother, the person
in charge of such hospital or such person's designated representative shall
-11-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
provide to the child's biological mother and birth mother the documents and
written instructions for such biological mother and birth mother to complete a
notarized acknowledgment of maternity. Such acknowledgment, if signed by both
parties and notarized, shall be filed with the department at the same time at
which the certificate of live birth is filed.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require the person in
charge of such hospital or such person's designee to seek out or otherwise
locate an alleged mother who is not readily identifiable or available.
(4) The acknowledgment shall be executed on a form prepared by the
department. Such form shall be in essentially the same form provided by the
department. The acknowledgment shall include, but not be limited to, (a) a
statement by the birth mother consenting to the acknowledgment of maternity and
a statement that the biological mother is the legal mother of the child, (b) a
statement by the biological mother that she is the biological mother of the
child, (c) written information regarding parental rights and responsibilities,
and (d) the social security numbers of the mothers.
(5) The form provided for in subsection (4) of this section shall also
contain instructions for completion and filing with the department if it is not
completed and filed with a birth certificate as provided in subsection (2) of
this section.
(6) The department shall accept completed acknowledgment forms. The
department may prepare photographic, electronic, or other reproductions of
acknowledgments. Such reproductions, when certified and approved by the
department, shall be accepted as the original records, and the documents from
which permanent reproductions have been made may be disposed of as provided by
rules and regulations of the department.
(7) The department shall enter on the birth certificate of any child
described in subsection (2) of this section the name of the biological mother
of the child upon receipt of an acknowledgment of maternity as provided in this
section signed by the biological mother of the child and the birth mother of
the child. The name of the birth mother shall not be entered on the birth
certificate. If the birth mother is married, the name of the birth mother's
spouse shall not be entered on the birth certificate unless paternity for such
spouse is otherwise established by law.
(8)(a) The signing of a notarized acknowledgment of maternity, whether
under this section or otherwise, by the biological mother shall create a
rebuttable presumption of maternity as against the biological mother. The
signed, notarized acknowledgment is subject to the right of any signatory to
rescind the acknowledgment at any time prior to the earlier of:
(i) Sixty days after the acknowledgment; or
(ii) The date of an administrative or judicial proceeding relating to the
child, including a proceeding to establish a support order in which the
signatory is a party.
(b) After the rescission period provided for in subdivision (8)(a) of this
section, a signed, notarized acknowledgment is considered a legal finding which
may be challenged only on the basis of fraud, duress, or material mistake of
fact with the burden of proof upon the challenger, and the legal
responsibilities, including the child support obligation, of any signatory
arising from the acknowledgment shall not be suspended during the challenge,
except for good cause shown. Such a signed and notarized acknowledgment or a
certified copy or certified reproduction thereof shall be admissible in
evidence in any proceeding to establish support.
(9)(a) If the biological mother was married at the time of either
conception or birth or at any time between conception and birth of a child
described in subsection (2) of this section, the name of the biological
mother's spouse shall be entered on the certificate as the other parent of the
child unless:
(i) Paternity has been determined otherwise by a court of competent
jurisdiction;
(ii) The biological mother and the biological mother's spouse execute
affidavits attesting that the biological mother's spouse is not the biological
parent of the child, in which case information about the other parent shall be
omitted from the certificate; or
(iii) The biological mother executes an affidavit attesting that her
spouse is not the biological father and naming the biological father; the
biological father executes an affidavit attesting that he is the biological
father; and the biological mother's spouse executes an affidavit attesting that
such spouse is not the biological parent of the child. In such case the
biological father shall be shown as the other parent on the certificate.
(b) For affidavits executed under subdivision (9)(a)(ii) (8)(a)(ii) or
(iii) of this section, each signature shall be individually notarized.
(10) If the biological mother was not married at the time of either
conception or birth or at any time between conception and birth, the name of
the biological father shall not be entered on the certificate as the other
parent without the written consent of the biological mother and the person
named as the biological father.
(11) In any case in which paternity of a child is determined by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the name of the adjudicated father shall be entered on
the certificate as the other parent in accordance with the finding of the
court.
(12) If the other parent is not named on the certificate, no other
information about the other parent shall be entered thereon.
(13) The identification of the father as provided in this section shall
-12-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
not be deemed to affect the legitimacy of the child or the duty to support as
set forth in sections 42-377 and 43-1401 to 43-1418.
(14) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as
necessary and proper to assist it in the implementation and administration of
this section and to establish a nominal payment and procedure for payment for
each acknowledgment filed with the department.
Sec. 22. Section 71-2489, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-2489 The regional behavioral health authorities and local public health
departments shall report on or before November 1 30 of each even-numbered year
to the division regarding the use of funds distributed for purposes of the
Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act and the outcomes achieved from the use of
such funds. The division shall report annually on or before December 31 15 to
the Legislature, the Governor, and the Attorney General regarding the use of
funds appropriated and distributed under the Opioid Prevention and Treatment
Act and the outcomes achieved from the use of such funds. The reports submitted
to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
Sec. 23. Section 71-2518, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-2518 (1) The Division of Public Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services shall establish a lead poisoning prevention program that has the
following components:
(a) A coordinated plan to prevent childhood lead poisoning and to minimize
exposure of the general public to lead-based paint hazards. Such plan shall:
(i) Provide a standard, stated in terms of micrograms of lead per
deciliter of whole blood, to be used in identifying elevated blood-lead levels;
(ii) Require that a child be tested for an elevated blood-lead level in
accordance with the medicaid state plan as defined in section 68-907 if the
child is a participant in the medical assistance program established pursuant
to the Medical Assistance Act; and
(iii) Recommend that a child be tested for elevated blood-lead levels if
the child resides in a zip code with a high prevalence of children with
elevated blood-lead levels as demonstrated by previous testing data or if the
child meets one of the criteria included in a lead poisoning prevention
screening questionnaire developed by the department; and
(b) An educational and community outreach plan regarding lead poisoning
prevention that shall, at a minimum, include the development of appropriate
educational materials targeted to health care providers, child care providers,
public school personnel, owners and tenants of residential dwellings, and
parents of young children. Such educational materials shall be made available
to the general public via the department's website.
(2) The results of all blood-lead level tests conducted in Nebraska shall
be reported to the department. When the department receives notice of a child
with an elevated blood-lead level as stated in the plan required pursuant to
subdivision (1)(a) of this section, it shall initiate contact with the local
public health department or the physician, or both, of such child and offer
technical assistance, if necessary.
(3) The department shall report electronically to the Legislature by
January 1, 2013, and each January 1 thereafter, the number of children from
birth through age six who were screened for elevated blood-lead levels during
the preceding fiscal year and who were confirmed to have elevated blood-lead
levels as stated in the plan required pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this
section. The report shall compare such results with those of previous fiscal
years and shall identify any revisions to the plan required by subdivision (1)
(a) of this section.
(3) (4) This section does not require the department to pay the cost of
elevated-blood-lead-level testing in accordance with this section except in
cases described in subdivision (1)(a)(ii) of this section.
Sec. 24. Section 71-4741, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-4741 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall determine
which birthing facilities are administering hearing screening tests to newborns
and infants on a voluntary basis and the number of newborns and infants
screened. The department shall submit electronically an annual report to the
Legislature stating the number of:
(a) Birthing facilities administering voluntary hearing screening tests
during birth admission;
(b) Newborns screened as compared to the total number of newborns born in
such facilities;
(c) Newborns who passed a hearing screening test during birth admission if
administered;
(d) Newborns who did not pass a hearing screening test during birth
admission if administered; and
(e) Newborns recommended for followup care.
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services, in consultation with the
State Department of Education, birthing facilities, and other providers, shall
develop approved screening methods and protocol for statewide hearing screening
tests of substantially all newborns and infants.
(3) Subject to available appropriations, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall make the report described in this section available.
Sec. 25. Section 76-3507, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
76-3507 On or before January 1, 2020, and on or before January 1 of each
-13-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
year thereafter, the department shall compile the results of the radon
measurements performed in the past five years that were reported to the
department pursuant to the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
department regarding the control of radiation and report such compilation
electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature. The department Such report
shall determine the average radon concentration in Nebraska by county and
identify each county in which such average concentration exceeds two and seven-
tenths picocuries per liter of air.
Sec. 26. Section 81-132, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-132 (1) All departments, offices, institutions, and expending agencies
of the state government requesting appropriations for the next biennium shall
file in the office of the Director of Administrative Services the budget forms
furnished them by the director under the provisions of sections 81-1113 and
81-1113.01. Such budget forms shall be filed on or before September 15 of each
even-numbered year. The forms shall show their total estimated requirements for
the next biennium for each unit of their organization and activity classified
as to object of expenditure. With such forms, each department, office,
institution, and expending agency shall file a report showing all money
received by such department, office, institution, or expending agency together
with the estimated receipts for the next biennium. Such estimates shall be
accompanied by a statement in writing giving facts and explanations of reasons
for each item of increased appropriation requested. The report submitted by the
Department of Health and Human Services shall include, but not be limited to,
the key goals, benchmarks, and progress reports required pursuant to sections
81-3133.01 81-3133 to 81-3133.03.
(2) Any department, office, institution, or expending agency proposing
changes to its appropriation for the biennium in progress shall file in the
office of the Director of Administrative Services the budget forms for
requesting such changes furnished by the director under the provisions of
sections 81-1113 and 81-1113.01. Such forms shall be filed on or before October
24 of each odd-numbered year.
Sec. 27. Section 81-638, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-638 (1) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the Legislature
shall appropriate for each year from the Health and Human Services Cash Fund to
the department an amount derived from one cent of the cigarette tax imposed by
section 77-2602, less any amount appropriated from the fund specifically to the
University of Nebraska Eppley Institute for Research in Cancer and Allied
Diseases. The department shall, after deducting expenses incurred in the
administration of such funds, distribute such funds exclusively for grants and
contracts for research of cancer and smoking diseases, for funding the cancer
registry prescribed in sections 81-642 to 81-649.02 81-650, and for associated
expenses due to the establishment and maintenance of such cancer registry. Not
more than two hundred thousand dollars shall be appropriated for funding the
cancer registry and associated expenses. The University of Nebraska may receive
such grants and contracts, and other postsecondary institutions having colleges
of medicine located in the State of Nebraska may receive such contracts.
(2) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the Legislature shall
appropriate for each year from the Health and Human Services Cash Fund to the
department for cancer research an amount derived from two cents of the
cigarette tax imposed by section 77-2602 to be used exclusively for grants and
contracts for research on cancer and smoking diseases. No amount shall be
appropriated or used pursuant to this subsection for the operation and
associated expenses of the cancer registry. Not more than one-half of the funds
appropriated pursuant to this subsection shall be distributed to the University
of Nebraska Medical Center for research in cancer and allied diseases and the
University of Nebraska Eppley Institute for Research in Cancer and Allied
Diseases. The remaining funds available pursuant to this subsection shall be
distributed for contracts with other postsecondary educational institutions
having colleges of medicine located in Nebraska which have cancer research
programs for the purpose of conducting research in cancer and allied diseases.
(3) Any contract between the department and another postsecondary
educational institution for cancer research under subsection (2) of this
section shall provide that:
(a) Any money appropriated for such contract shall only be used for cancer
research and shall not be used to support any other program in the institution;
and
(b) Full and detailed reporting of the expenditure of all funds under the
contract is required. The report shall include, but not be limited to, separate
accounting for personal services, equipment purchases or leases, and supplies.
Such reports shall be made available electronically to the Legislature; and
(b) (c) No money appropriated for such contract shall be spent for travel,
building construction, or any other purpose not directly related to the
research that is the subject of the contract.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven million dollars from the
Health and Human Services Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30,
2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator
of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services. It is the
intent of the Legislature that the transfer to the General Fund in this
subsection be from funds credited to the Cancer Research subfund of the Health
and Human Services Cash Fund which were in excess of appropriations established
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
-14-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
Sec. 28. Section 81-642, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-642 It is the intent of the Legislature to require the establishment
and maintenance of a cancer registry for the State of Nebraska. This
responsibility is delegated to the Department of Health and Human Services
along with the authority to exercise the necessary powers to implement sections
81-642 to 81-649.02 81-650. To insure an accurate and continuing source of data
concerning cancer, all hospitals within the state shall make available to the
department upon its request, at least once a year, information contained in the
medical records of patients who have cancer within such time following its
diagnosis as the department shall require. Any medical doctor, osteopathic
physician, or dentist within the state shall make such information available to
the department upon request by the department. This cancer registry should
provide a central data bank of accurate, precise, and current information which
medical authorities state will assist in the research for the prevention, cure,
and control of cancer. The information contained in the cancer registry may be
used as a source of data for scientific and medical research. Any information
released from the cancer registry shall be disclosed as Class I, Class II,
Class III, or Class IV data as provided in sections 81-663 to 81-675.
Sec. 29. Section 81-643, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-643 As used in sections 81-642 to 81-649.02 81-650, unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions in section 81-664 shall be used and:
(1) Cancer shall mean: (a) A large group of diseases characterized by an
uncontrolled growth and spread of abnormal cells; (b) any condition of tumors
having the properties of anaplasia, invasion, and metastasis; (c) a cellular
tumor the natural course of which is fatal; and (d) malignant neoplasm. Cancer
shall be deemed to include, but not be limited to, carcinoma, sarcoma,
melanoma, lymphoma, Hodgkin's disease, and myeloma, but shall not include
precancerous conditions, benign polyps, or benign tumors; and
(2) Cancer registry shall mean the system of reporting established by
sections 81-642 to 81-649.02 81-650 in which the cases of cancer in this state
are reported and recorded in order to achieve the goals of prevention, cure,
and control of cancer through research and education.
Sec. 30. Section 81-645, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-645 In order to implement the intent and purposes of sections 81-642 to
81-649.02 81-650, the department shall:
(1) Compile and publish a statistical report annually or at reasonable
intervals containing information obtained from patient data pursuant to such
sections in order to provide accessible information useful to physicians,
medical personnel, and the public. Such report shall comply with sections
81-663 to 81-675;
(2) Comply with all necessary requirements in order to obtain funds or
grants;
(3) Coordinate with existing statewide cancer registry programs to the
extent feasible; and
(4) Consult with medical professionals, hospital tumor registries, and
medical records representatives in formulating the plans and policies of the
cancer registry program.
Sec. 31. Section 81-648, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-648 No hospital, medical doctor, osteopathic physician, or dentist nor
any administrator, officer, or employee of such hospital or office in which any
such professional practices take place who is in compliance with sections
81-642 to 81-649.02 81-650 and 81-663 to 81-675 shall be civilly or criminally
liable for divulging the information required pursuant to such sections. The
department or any of its officials or employees shall not be liable civilly or
criminally for the release of information contained in the cancer registry or
for the conduct or activities of any individual or entity permitted access to
data of the cancer registry if done pursuant to sections 81-663 to 81-675.
Sec. 32. Section 81-649, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-649 Sections 81-642 to 81-649.02 81-650 shall not be deemed to compel
any individual to submit to any medical examination or supervision by the
department, any of its authorized representatives, or an approved researcher.
No person who seeks information or obtains registry data pursuant to such
sections or sections 81-663 to 81-675 shall contact a patient on the registry
or such patient's family unless the registry has first obtained the permission
of such patient or patient's family. The registry shall coordinate its
activities with the person desiring such contact and may authorize the person
desiring such contact to perform these contacts under the direction of the
registry.
Sec. 33. Section 81-649.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-649.02 Any hospital which fails to make reports as provided in sections
81-642 to 81-649.02 81-650 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor for each
offense.
Sec. 34. Section 81-664, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-664 For purposes of sections 81-663 to 81-675:
(1) Aggregate data means data contained in the medical record and health
information registries maintained by the department which is compiled in a
-15-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
statistical format and which does not include patient-identifying data;
(2) Approved researcher means an individual or entity which is approved by
the department pursuant to section 81-666 to obtain access to data contained in
the medical record and health information registries maintained by the
department to assist in the scientific or medical research for the prevention,
cure, or control of a disease or injury process;
(3) Case-specific data means data contained in the medical record and
health information registries concerning a specific individual other than
patient-identifying data;
(4) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(5) Medical record and health information registry means the system of
reporting certain medical conditions occurring in this state, as prescribed by
law, which are reported and recorded in order to achieve the goals of
prevention, cure, and control through research and education, and includes the
birth defects registry established in section 71-646, the cancer registry
established in sections 81-642 to 81-649.02 81-650, the brain injury registry
established in the Brain Injury Registry Act, the Parkinson's Disease Registry
established in the Parkinson's Disease Registry Act, and the statewide stroke
data registry established in the Stroke System of Care Act;
(6) Patient-identifying data means the patient's name, address, record
number, symbol, or other identifying particular assigned to or related to an
individual patient; and
(7) Research means study specific to the diseases or injuries for which
access to data is requested and which is dedicated to the prevention, cure, or
control of the diseases or injuries.
Sec. 35. Section 81-6,116, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-6,116 (1) Information reported under section 81-6,114 may be used by
the department for statistical and public health planning purposes and for
other public health purposes as identified by the department in rule and
regulation.
(2) The department shall periodically review information collected under
section 81-6,114 for the purpose of identifying potential policies or practices
of any reporting facility which may be detrimental to the public health,
including, but not limited to, policies and practices which may have the effect
of limiting access to needed health care services for Nebraska residents. The
department shall provide electronically recommendations to the Health and Human
Services Committee of the Legislature relating to appropriate administrative
and legislative responses to such policies and practices and shall provide
electronically an annual report to the chairperson of such committee of its
findings and its current or planned activities under this section, if any.
Sec. 36. Section 81-1113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-1113 The budget division shall prepare the executive budget in
accordance with the wishes and policies of the Governor. The budget division
shall have the following duties, powers, and responsibilities:
(1) Shall prescribe the forms and procedures to be employed by all
departments and agencies of the state in compiling and submitting their
individual budget requests and shall set up a budget calendar which shall
provide for (a) the date, not later than July 15 of each even-numbered year,
for distribution of instructions, (b) the date by which time requests for
appropriations by each agency shall be submitted, and (c) the period during
which such public hearings as the Governor may elect shall be held for each
department and agency. The budget request shall be submitted each even-numbered
year no later than the date provided in subsection (1) of section 81-132, shall
include the intended receipts and expenditures by programs, subprograms, and
activities and such additional information as the administrator may deem
appropriate for each fiscal year, including the certification described in
subdivision (4) of this section, shall be made upon a biennial basis, and shall
include actual receipts and actual expenditures for each fiscal year of the
most recently completed biennium and the first year of the current biennium and
estimates for the second year of the current biennium and each year of the next
ensuing biennium;
(2) Shall prescribe the forms and procedures to be employed by all
departments and agencies of the state in compiling and submitting their
proposed changes to existing appropriations for the biennium in progress. The
budget division shall distribute instructions and forms to all departments and
agencies no later than September 15 of each odd-numbered year. Departments and
agencies shall submit their proposed changes no later than the date provided in
subsection (2) of section 81-132;
(3) Shall work with each governmental department and agency in developing
performance standards for each program, subprogram, and activity to measure and
evaluate present as well as projected levels of expenditures. The budget
division shall also work with the Department of Health and Human Services to
develop key goals, benchmarks, and methods of quantification of progress
required pursuant to sections 81-3133.01 81-3133 to 81-3133.03;
(4)(a) Shall develop a certification form and procedure to be included in
each budget request under subdivision (1) of this section through which each
department and agency shall certify, for each program or practice it
administers, whether such program or practice is an evidence-based program or
practice, or, if not, whether such program or practice is reasonably capable of
becoming an evidence-based program or practice;
(b) For purposes of this subdivision (4):
-16-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
(i) Evidence-based means that a program or practice (A) offers a high
level of research on effectiveness, determined as a result of multiple rigorous
evaluations, such as randomized controlled trials and evaluations that
incorporate strong comparison group designs or a single large multisite
randomized study and (B) to the extent practicable, has specified procedures
that allow for successful replication;
(ii) Program or practice means a function or activity that is sufficiently
identifiable as a discrete unit of service; and
(iii) Reasonably capable of becoming an evidence-based program or practice
means the program or practice is susceptible to quantifiable benchmarks that
measure service delivery, client or customer satisfaction, or efficiency;
(5) Shall, following passage of legislative appropriations, be responsible
for the administration of the approved budget through budgetary allotments;
(6) Shall be responsible for a monthly budgetary report for each
department and agency showing comparisons between actual expenditures and
allotments, which report shall be subject to review by the director and budget
administrator; and
(7) Shall be responsible for the authorization of employee positions. Such
authorizations shall be based on the following:
(a) A requirement that a sufficient budget program appropriation and
salary limitation exist to fully fund all authorized positions;
(b) A requirement that permanent full-time positions which have been
vacant for ninety days or more be reviewed and reauthorized prior to being
filled. If requested by the budget division, the personnel division of the
Department of Administrative Services shall review such vacant position to
determine the proper classification for the position;
(c) A requirement that authorized positions accurately reflect legislative
intent contained in legislative appropriation and intent bills; and
(d) Other relevant criteria as determined by the budget administrator.
Sec. 37. Section 83-102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
83-102 (1) Youth rehabilitation and treatment centers shall be operated to
provide programming and services to rehabilitate and treat juveniles committed
under the Nebraska Juvenile Code. Each youth rehabilitation and treatment
center shall be considered a separate placement. Each youth rehabilitation and
treatment center shall provide:
(a) Safe and sanitary space for sleeping, hygiene, education, programming,
treatment, recreation, and visitation for each juvenile;
(b) Health care and medical services;
(c) Appropriate physical separation and segregation of juveniles based on
gender;
(d) Sufficient staffing to comply with state and federal law and protect
the safety and security of each juvenile;
(e) Training that is specific to the population being served at the youth
rehabilitation and treatment center;
(f) A facility administrator for each youth rehabilitation and treatment
center who has the sole responsibility for administration of a single youth
rehabilitation and treatment center;
(g) An evaluation process for the development of an individualized
treatment plan within fourteen days after admission to the youth rehabilitation
and treatment center;
(h) An age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate education program
for each juvenile that can award relevant and necessary credits toward high
school graduation that will be accepted by any public school district in the
State of Nebraska. Juveniles committed to the youth rehabilitation and
treatment centers are entitled to receive an appropriate education equivalent
to educational opportunities offered within the regular settings of public
school districts across the State of Nebraska;
(i) A case management and coordination process, designed to assure
appropriate reintegration of the juvenile with his or her family, school, and
community;
(j) Compliance with the requirements stated in Title XIX and Title IV-E of
the federal Social Security Act, as such act existed on January 1, 2020, the
Special Education Act, or other funding guidelines as appropriate;
(k) Research-based or evidence-based programming for all juveniles that
includes a strong academic program and classes in health education, living
skills, vocational training, behavior management and modification, money
management, family and parent responsibilities, substance use awareness,
physical education, job skills training, and job placement assistance; and
(l) Research-based or evidence-based treatment service for behavioral
impairment, severe emotional disturbance, sex offender behavior, other mental
health or psychiatric disorder, drug and alcohol addiction, physical or sexual
abuse, and any other treatment indicated by a juvenile's individualized
treatment plan.
(2) Each youth rehabilitation and treatment center shall be accredited by
a nationally recognized entity that provides accreditation for juvenile
facilities and shall maintain accreditation as provided in section 79-703 to
provide an age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate education program.
(3) Each youth rehabilitation and treatment center shall electronically
submit a report of its activities for the preceding fiscal year to the Clerk of
the Legislature on or before July 15 of each year beginning on July 15, 2021.
The annual report shall include, but not be limited to, the following
information:
-17-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
(a) Data on the population served, including, but not limited to,
admissions, average daily census, average length of stay, race, and ethnicity;
(b) An overview of programming and services; and
(c) An overview of any facility issues or facility improvements.
Sec. 38. Section 83-105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
83-105 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a reporting
system in order to provide increased accountability and oversight regarding the
treatment of juveniles in youth rehabilitation and treatment centers.
(2) Beginning on January 1, 2021, the Department of Health and Human
Services shall submit a report electronically to the office of Inspector
General of Nebraska Child Welfare each February 15, May 15, August 15, and
November 15 January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1. Such report shall
include the following information for the prior calendar quarter:
(a) The number of grievances filed at each youth rehabilitation and
treatment center separated by facility;
(b) A categorization of the issues to which each grievance relates and the
number of grievances received in each category;
(c) The process for addressing such grievances; and
(d) Any actions or changes made as a result of such grievances.
Sec. 39. Section 83-4,134.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-4,134.01 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a system
of investigation and performance review in order to provide increased
accountability and oversight regarding the use of room confinement for
juveniles in a juvenile facility.
(2) The following shall apply regarding placement in room confinement of a
juvenile in a juvenile facility:
(a) Room confinement of a juvenile for longer than one hour during a
twenty-four-hour period shall be documented and approved in writing by a
supervisor in the juvenile facility. Documentation of the room confinement
shall include the date of the occurrence; the race, ethnicity, age, and gender
of the juvenile; the reason for placement of the juvenile in room confinement;
an explanation of why less restrictive means were unsuccessful; the ultimate
duration of the placement in room confinement; facility staffing levels at the
time of confinement; and any incidents of self-harm or suicide committed by the
juvenile while he or she was isolated;
(b) If any physical or mental health clinical evaluation was performed
during the time the juvenile was in room confinement for longer than one hour,
the results of such evaluation shall be considered in any decision to place a
juvenile in room confinement or to continue room confinement;
(c) The juvenile facility shall submit a report quarterly to the
Legislature on the juveniles placed in room confinement; the length of time
each juvenile was in room confinement; the race, ethnicity, age, and gender of
each juvenile placed in room confinement; facility staffing levels at the time
of confinement; and the reason each juvenile was placed in room confinement.
The report shall specifically address each instance of room confinement of a
juvenile for more than four hours, including all reasons why attempts to return
the juvenile to the general population of the juvenile facility were
unsuccessful. The report shall also detail all corrective measures taken in
response to noncompliance with this section. The report shall redact all
personal identifying information but shall provide individual, not aggregate,
data. The report shall be delivered electronically to the Legislature. The
initial quarterly report shall be submitted within two weeks after the quarter
ending on September 30, 2016. Subsequent reports shall be submitted for the
ensuing quarters within four two weeks after the end of each quarter; and
(d) The Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare shall review all data
collected pursuant to this section in order to assess the use of room
confinement for juveniles in each juvenile facility and prepare an annual
report of his or her findings, including, but not limited to, identifying
changes in policy and practice which may lead to decreased use of such
confinement as well as model evidence-based criteria to be used to determine
when a juvenile should be placed in room confinement. The report shall be
delivered electronically to the Legislature on an annual basis.
(3) The use of consecutive periods of room confinement to avoid the intent
or purpose of this section is prohibited.
(4) Any juvenile facility which is not a residential child-caring agency
which fails to comply with the requirements of this section is subject to
disciplinary action as provided in section 83-4,134. Any juvenile facility
which is a residential child-caring agency which fails to comply with the
requirements of this section is subject to disciplinary action as provided in
section 71-1940.
Sec. 40. Section 83-1216.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1216.01 (1)(a) The department shall, with the assistance and support of
the Advisory Committee on Developmental Disabilities, develop and implement a
quality management and improvement plan to promote and monitor quality relating
to services and quality of life for persons with developmental disabilities.
(b) The purpose of the quality management and improvement plan is to
provide information necessary for an accurate assessment of the quality and
effectiveness of services for persons with developmental disabilities and their
families and the delivery of such services, with special attention to the
impact that the services have on the quality of life of recipients and their
-18-

LB376 LB376
2025 2025
families.
(c) The quality management and improvement plan shall reflect national
best practice for services for persons with developmental disabilities and
their families as determined by the department with the assistance of the
advisory committee.
(d) The quality management and improvement plan shall assess, through both
quantitative and qualitative means, (i) the quality of services provided to
persons with developmental disabilities and their families, (ii) the ability of
the services provided to meet the needs of the recipients of the services,
(iii) the effect of the services to support or improve the quality of life of
the recipients of the services, and (iv) the satisfaction of the recipients
with the process of determination of eligibility and the process of delivery of
the services. In order to develop the quality management and improvement plan,
the department shall use procedures to collect data from recipients of services
for persons with disabilities and their families by relying on external,
independent evaluators who are not employed by the department. The quality
management and improvement plan shall give significance to input gathered from
recipients of services for persons with developmental disabilities and families
of such recipients and include information gathered from the department.
(e) The quality management and improvement plan shall include
recommendations for improvements to the types of services and the delivery of
services for persons with developmental disabilities and their families.
(2) The department shall provide a quality management plan electronically
to the Legislature no later than September 30, 2017. In the plan the department
shall detail its approach to ensuring a sustainable, continuous, quality
improvement management system for the delivery of services for persons with
developmental disabilities and their families that incorporates
responsibilities of the department and recipients.
(3) The department shall issue an implementation report regarding the
quality management and improvement plan and publish it on the website of the
department and provide it electronically to the Legislature on or before
December 30, 2017, and March 30, 2018. Beginning in 2018, the department shall
annually provide a report regarding outcomes, improvement priorities, and
activities of the department during the previous fiscal year. The report shall
be published on the website of the department and shall be provided
electronically to the Legislature on or before September 30.
Sec. 41. Original sections 28-3,107, 43-512.11, 43-3301, 43-3342.04,
68-130, 68-158, 68-909, 68-912, 68-1735.03, 68-1804, 69-2409.01, 71-2518,
71-4741, 81-132, 81-638, 81-642, 81-643, 81-645, 81-648, 81-649, 81-649.02,
81-664, 81-6,116, 81-1113, 83-102, 83-105, 83-4,134.01, and 83-1216.01, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 38-1130, 38-1208.01, 38-1216,
43-4706, 68-974, 68-995, 68-9,109, 68-1530, 71-509, 71-604.02, 71-2489, and
76-3507, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 42. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 43-3326,
48-2307, 68-1118, 68-1518, 68-1735.02, 68-2004, 71-17,115, 71-3005, 71-8313,
81-650, 81-1139.01, and 81-3133, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-19-